dictionaries/sv_SE/sv_SE.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY aerndtislogmkpbhfjuväcöåyqxzvwéâàáèóćńłšőř:-.

WORDCHARS -0123456789.:

BREAK 3
BREAK -
BREAK .$
BREAK :

NOSUGGEST !

FORBIDDENWORD %

NEEDAFFIX ¤

# At least this many letters in each word within a compound:
COMPOUNDMIN 1
#COMPOUNDMIN 3

# Only two, three or four word compounds:
#COMPOUNDWORDMAX 4

# Disallow triple letters, like "fall"+"lucka":
CHECKCOMPOUNDTRIPLE
# Convert triple letters to double in compounds,
# e.g. "fall"+"lucka" = "fallucka":
SIMPLIFIEDTRIPLE
# Disallow word duplication in compounds, like "bil"+"bil":
CHECKCOMPOUNDDUP

# The generated compound word suggestions are sometimes
# very useful. At other times, they make users go crazy with
# dismay since the generated words make no sense.
MAXCPDSUGS 0

# Users get distracted by too wild suggestions
MAXDIFF 5
ONLYMAXDIFF

# This is a must for Swedish:
NOSPLITSUGS

FULLSTRIP

FORCEUCASE c

# Don't allow autogenerated compounds that are very similar
# to some word in the dictionary:
CHECKCOMPOUNDREP

# For suffixes used to create first part of a compound
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG W

# May appear first in compound words:
COMPOUNDBEGIN X

# May be middle elements in compound words:
COMPOUNDMIDDLE U

# May appear last in compound words:
COMPOUNDEND Y

# Non-word that may be part of a compund:
ONLYINCOMPOUND Z

MAP 2
MAP ﬁ(fi)
MAP ﬂ(fl)

# Some letters that should be replacable and have higher priority
REP 59
REP e ä
REP ä e
REP ngn gn
REP gn ng
REP ng gn
REP j g
REP g j
REP gt kt
REP kt gt
REP dj g
REP j lj
REP j gj
REP gj j
REP kj tj
REP tj kj
REP ch tj
REP tj ch
REP ch kj
REP kj ch
REP ch ige
REP ch j
REP ch i
REP ch ge
REP ch stg
REP sk skj
REP skj sk
REP sj sti
REP ti ssi
REP ssi ti
REP tj k
REP ai ej
REP mm m
REP s ss
REP l ll
REP ll l
REP t tt
REP n nn
REP p pp
REP g gg
REP d t
REP t d
REP ^bla$ bl.a.
REP ^pga$ p.g.a.
REP ^tex$ t.ex.
REP ^pga$ p.g.a.
REP ^tex$ t.ex.
REP ^iafton$ i_afton
REP ^iakt$ i_akt
REP ^imorse$ i_morse
REP ^igår i_går_
REP ochmed$ _och_med
REP ^iordning$ i_ordning
REP ^istyr$ i_styr
REP ^isynnerhet$ i_synnerhet
REP ^iår$ i_år
REP ^iövrigt$ i_övrigt
REP ^utochin$ ut_och_in
REP ^åfärde$ å_färde
REP is eece
#REP m mm
#REP ss s
#REP ll l
#REP tt t
#REP nn n
#REP pp p
#REP gg g
#REP f ff
#REP ff f
#REP rr r
#REP r rr
#REP andet ningen
#REP ningen andet

# För förkortningar och ord som kräver bindestreck
# när de är andraord i sammansättningar, t.ex. TV, OS
# (betal-TV, London-OS).
#PFX  a  Y  1
#PFX  a  0  -/WY  .


# Genitiv. Som Göran: Görans
SFX  A  Y  1
SFX  A  0  s  .

#--------------------------------------------
# Bestämd form, neutrum.
#--------------------------------------------
# Substantivformer av verb.
# Som lida: lidande, lidandet...
SFX  B  Y  6
SFX  B  0  et  [^a]
SFX  B  0  ets  [^a]
SFX  B  0  nde  a
SFX  B  0  ndes  a
SFX  B  0  ndet  a
SFX  B  0  ndets  a

# Som täcke: täcket, täckets
# Även: öra, alibi, foto
# Som kakel: kaklet, kaklets
# Som vimmel: vimlet, vimlets
# Som socker: sockret, sockrets
# Som nummer: numret, numrets
# Som rum: rummet, rummets
# Som tecken: tecknet, tecknets
# Som ton: tonnet, tonnets
SFX  C  Y  16
SFX  C  0  t  [aeiouyåäöé:]
SFX  C  0  ts  [aeiouyåäöé:]
SFX  C  el  let  [^m]el
SFX  C  el  lets  [^m]el
SFX  C  mel  let  mel
SFX  C  mel  lets  mel
SFX  C  er  ret  [^m]er
SFX  C  er  rets  [^m]er
SFX  C  mer  ret  mer
SFX  C  mer  rets  mer
SFX  C  0  met  m
SFX  C  0  mets  m
SFX  C  en net en
SFX  C  en nets en
SFX  C  0  net  [^e]n
SFX  C  0  nets  [^e]n

#--------------------------------------------
# Bestämd form, utrum.
#--------------------------------------------
# Som katt: katten, kattens
#--------------------------------------------
# Adjektivformer av verb (och presens particip):
#--------------------------------------------
# Som söka: sökande
#--------------------------------------------
SFX  D  Y  3
SFX  D  0  en  [^a]
SFX  D  0  ens  [^a]
SFX  D  0  nde  a

# Bestämd form, utrum samt
# obestämd form pluralis, neutrum.
#--------------------------------------------
# Som myra, cykel: cykeln, cykelns
# Som frö: frön, fröns
# Som faktum: fakta, faktas
SFX  E  Y  4
SFX  E  0  n  [^m]
SFX  E  0  ns  [^m]
SFX  E  um  a  um
SFX  E  um  as  um

#--------------------------------------------
# Neutrum, bestämd form pluralis samt
# utrum, bestämd form singularis.
#--------------------------------------------
# Som fönster, fader
# Som nummer
# Som exempel
# Som vimmel, himmel
# Som tecken: tecknen, tecknens
# Som socken: socknen, socknens
# Som hem, rem
# Som ton, man
# Som täcke, bi, kilo, knä
# Substantivformer av verb:
# Som avslöja: avslöjandena, avslöjandenas
SFX  F  Y  18
SFX  F  er  ren  [^m]er
SFX  F  er  rens  [^m]er
SFX  F  mer  ren  mer
SFX  F  mer  rens  mer
SFX  F  el  len  [^m]el
SFX  F  el  lens  [^m]el
SFX  F  mel  len  mel
SFX  F  mel  lens  mel
SFX  F  en  nen  en
SFX  F  en  nens  en
SFX  F  0  men  m
SFX  F  0  mens  m
SFX  F  0  nen  [^e]n
SFX  F  0  nens  [^e]n
SFX  F  0  na  [eioä:]
SFX  F  0  nas  [eioä:]
SFX  F  0  ndena  a
SFX  F  0  ndenas  a

#--------------------------------------------
# Pluralis, reale.
#--------------------------------------------
# Som stol: stolar, stolarna, stolarnas, stolars
# Även: del
# Som timme: timmar, timmarna, timmarnas, timmars
# Som fara: faror, farorna, farornas, farors
SFX  G  Y  12
SFX  G  0  ar  [^ae]
SFX  G  0  arna  [^ae]
SFX  G  0  arnas  [^ae]
SFX  G  0  ars  [^ae]
SFX  G  e  ar  e
SFX  G  e  arna  e
SFX  G  e  arnas  e
SFX  G  e  ars  e
SFX  G  a  or  a
SFX  G  a  orna  a
SFX  G  a  ornas  a
SFX  G  a  ors  a

# Som katt: katter, katterna, katternas, katters
# Som historia: historier, historierna, historiernas, historiers 
SFX  H  Y  8
SFX  H  0  er  [^a]
SFX  H  0  ers  [^a]
SFX  H  0  erna  [^a]
SFX  H  0  ernas  [^a]
SFX  H  a  er  a
SFX  H  a  erna  a
SFX  H  a  ernas  a
SFX  H  a  ers  a

# Som tå
# Som fröken: fröknar, fröknarna, fröknarnas, fröknars
# Även: socken, öken
# Som afton
# Som dröm: drömmar, drömmarna, drömmarnas, drömmars
# Som tistel
# Som lymmel
# Som tiger: tigrar, tigrarna, tigrarnas, tigrars
# Som klammer: klamrar, klamrarna, klamrarnas, klamrars
# Som sommar: somrar, somrarna, somrarnas, somrars 
SFX  I  Y  36
SFX  I  0  r  [^lmnr]
SFX  I  0  rna  [^lmnr]
SFX  I  0  rnas  [^lmnr]
SFX  I  0  rs  [^lmnr]
SFX  I  en  nar  en
SFX  I  en  narna  en
SFX  I  en  narnas  en
SFX  I  en  nars  en
SFX  I  on  nar  on
SFX  I  on  narna  on
SFX  I  on  narnas  on
SFX  I  on  nars  on
SFX  I  0  mar  m
SFX  I  0  marna  m
SFX  I  0  marnas  m
SFX  I  0  mars  m
SFX  I  el  lar  [^m]el
SFX  I  el  larna  [^m]el
SFX  I  el  larnas  [^m]el
SFX  I  el  lars  [^m]el
SFX  I  mel  lar  mel
SFX  I  mel  larna  mel
SFX  I  mel  larnas  mel
SFX  I  mel  lars  mel
SFX  I  er  rar  [^m]er
SFX  I  er  rarna  [^m]er
SFX  I  er  rarnas  [^m]er
SFX  I  er  rars  [^m]er
SFX  I  mer  rar  mer
SFX  I  mer  rarna  mer
SFX  I  mer  rarnas  mer
SFX  I  mer  rars  mer
SFX  I  mar  rar  mar
SFX  I  mar  rarna  mar
SFX  I  mar  rarnas  mar
SFX  I  mar  rars  mar
