dictionaries/sv_SE/sv_SE.dic
analysfas/DH
analyssvar/ABDY
andragradsekvation/ADH
angelägenhet/ADfHvY
angorajumper/AEIY
antibiotikum/ABEY
aprikoslund/ADG
arbetsområde/ACEFY
arpeggio/ACEFY
arrowrot/ADJ
artistnamn/ABDvY
auditör/ADHY
avdagatog/Aj
avsägelse/AEIXY
avtjäna/ADjmNP
axplockning/ADGvY
backsöta/AEG
baksäte/ACEFvY
baktaleri/ABHY
barnarsle/ACEF
barracuda/AEGXY
bastu/AEIXY
begrunda/ADjmNP
bergart/ADHvY
bergsklättring/ADGvY
besittningsskydd/ABDY
besparingsiver/AEY
bibehållande/ACXY
bind/AbRy
bisamhälle/ACEFY
bistrostuk/ABDY
biståndsminister/AEIY
blindschack/ABY
bläckfisk/ADGXY
bohuseka/AEG
bordsdam/ADH
boskapshägn/ABD
bosparande/ACY
bostadsfastighet/ADHY
bosättningsområde/ACEFY
bottna/ADINPY
brölande/ACEFY
bröllopsklänning/ADGY
Buskhyttebo/AEI
Bärby/A
börsaffär/ADHY
cabotage/ACXY
caddie/AEIY
chockbud/ABD
cirkusprinsessa/AEG
cykelaffär/ADHY
cytostatikum/ABEY
dagsarbete/ACEFY
danssko/AEIXY
dartturnering/ADG
denatoniumbensoat/ADH
diagram/ACFXY
djurstig/ADG
dosimeter/AEIY
dragé/AEHXY
dragspel/ABDvY
duffelmodell/ADH
duntäcke/ACEFY
duodesformat/ABDY
duplikator/AEHY
efterbete/ACEF
eldslåga/AEG
elflygel/AEI
elproduktion/ADvY
elva/AEG
eukaristibön/ADH
fackman/AFY
fanbild/ADHv
fanergolv/ABD
fantasifoster/ACFY
fason/ADHY
feber/AEIXY
felparkering/ADGY
feodalvälde/ACEFY
filosofiuppsats/DH
fluoridera/ADjmNP
flygfisk/ADG
flygfoto/ACEFX
flyttfågel/AEIvXY
flöte/ACEFY
folknöje/ACEF
forskningsinstitut/ABDY
forskningsresultat/ABDY
framstegsrapport/ADHY
frisko/%AEI
frondering/ADGvY
frysvara/AEG
frågetecken/ACFY
fågelvän/AF
fångarbete/ACEFY
förförståelse/AEIY
förkastningsbrant/ADHY
förkrigstid/ADvY
förkylningsvirus/BDY
förlagsarbete/ACY
förminskning/ADfGvY
försalong/ADHY
förständigande/ACEFY
gallko/AEI
gasvajer/AEIX
generationsskifte/ACEFY
gipsbyte/ACEF
gipsform/ADG
glykosid/ADHY
golftävling/ADGY
gomtak/ABD
grannby/AEG
gravkummel/ACF
grenseger/AEIY
grundton/ADHvY
gråval/ADGv
gudatempel/ACF
göktyta/AEG
hallstämpel/AEI
halvmesyr/ADHY
halvslum/AF
hamnanläggning/ADGY
hamnkapten/ADHY
hanegäll/ABD
headset/ABDY
helrim/ACF
hjortfilé/AEHX
Holmblad/A
hornlåt/ADG
hudkostym/ADH
huggvapen/ACFY
hylle/ACEFz
hylsnyckel/AEIXY
hårdvax/BHX
hängdriva/AEG
hästtävling/ADGY
högfjällshotell/ABD
högstaliga/AEG
iläggssöm/AFIY
inbjudningskod/ADH
informationsutbyte/ACEFY
inpressa/ADjmMN
insektsätare/AEJY
internutbildning/ADGY
isracingheat/ABD
jaguar/ADHX
jaktparti/ABHY
jesuitpater/AEIY
jordförbättringsmedel/ACFY
jubileumsprogram/ACFY
Jula/!A
järnspöke/%ACEF
jättesten/ADG
kapten/ADHvY
kejsarsnittsärr/ABD
kemtvättmedel/ACFY
kilo/ACEFY
kisel/ACEX
kittelhjälm/ADG
kjusa/AEG
klicker/AEIXY
kollektivtrafik/ADXY
kolportage/ACXY
kombiterminal/ADHY
konkursförfarande/ACEFY
konståkare/AEJY
kopieringspapper/ABCDFJY
korum/ABDE
kovall/ADH
krossande/AC
kudde/AEGY
kulturutbyte/ACEFY
kunskapare/AEJY
kväveutsläpp/ABDY
kycklinglever/AEIX
kylrum/ACFv
kynolog/ADH
kärnminne/ACEFY
köpenskap/ADHY
landssocken/AFI
landsvägsbro/AEGY
likhet/ADHvY
linne/CEFXY
linssoppa/AEGY
livsmedelspris/BHY
ljussensor/AEHY
lummerväxt/ADHY
lunnefågel/AEIvXY
lyftarm/ADG
lynne/ACEFvY
läroprocess/DHY
läshjälpmedel/ACF
lösensumma/AEG
manshuvud/ABDY
maskmedel/ACFY
matdisk/ADG
medaljchans/DHY
mediediskussion/ADH
medieområde/ACEF
mellandäck/ABDvY
menskalender/AEI
mobilnummer/ACFY
modernist/ADHTXY
moderåd/ABD
mossrivare/AEJ
musprutta/!DMv
mäklarfirma/AEGY
mätande/ACY
mö/ACEI
mörkman/AF
nagellacksrest/ADH
naivism/ADY
navigationsfel/ABDY
nyårsklänning/ADGvY
nödsituation/ADHvY
nöje/ACEFvY
nötkråka/AEG
omviktning/ADfGvY
omvisning/ADG
orosområde/ACEF
orostillstånd/ABD
packrem/AFIv
pannå/AEH
pantbelåning/ADGY
peddoäckel/!ACF
pleurit/ADH
polo/AbE
polyetylen/AB
poptext/ADHX
portionsbit/ADGY
praktikplats/DHY
preventivpiller/ACFY
propelleraxel/AEIXY
puder/ACXY
rashus/%BD
refraktionsfel/ABDY
regeringschef/ADHY
reklammän/AFY
rensköljning/ADv
retriever/AEIXY
riddarsporre/AEGY
ringlinje/AEIY
rundhult/AB
rutinarbete/ACEFY
ryggsim/ACFvY
rännsten/ADGvY
samspel/ABDvY
schaktmaskin/ADHY
segel/ACFXY
seglarskola/AEGY
semintjur/ADG
set/bBD
sexanklagelse/AEIY
sitterm/%ADH
skadevållande/AC
skevningsroder/ACFY
skriva/ABJKLRTYz
skrämskott/ABDvY
skylta/ADINPTY
skäggtomte/AEGXY
slampa/AEG
slumbefolkning/AD
småindustri/AEHY
snyftreportage/ACEY
solspektrum/ABDEY
spefågel/AEI
spelkväll/ADGvY
spetsbov/ADG
spontandansa/ADjmMN
spridningsområde/ACEFY
starkporter/AE
storbolag/ABDY
sträckbom/AFI
strösocker/ACXY
styrled/ADH
stövarras/DH
svallvåg/ADvY
svalunge/AEG
såpbad/ABD
söderläge/ACEFvY
tablettmissbrukare/AEJY
tavelbom/AFI
telefonstation/ADHY
tillbygge/ACEFY
tillsats/DHXY
tilltala/ADmNPvY
timmarsheat/6BDZ
timmerstuga/AEGY
trevare/AEJY
trippelallians/DHY
troslinje/AEI
tullbom/AFI
tvekljud/ABD
tygvepa/AEG
täckningsbidrag/ABDvY
täktområde/ACEF
upplärningsfas/DH
uppsvullnad/ADH
upptuktelse/AEIXY
utsläppsnivå/AEHY
utspring/AB
vapen/ACFUXY
varuutbyte/ACEFY
vattendel/ADG
vattenfylla/ADjJKLOR
vedfång/ABD
vip-loge/AEI
vokalljud/ABDY
vänsterfil/ADHY
västvälde/%ACEF
yrselanfall/ABDY
Zimmerman/A
åkerplätt/ADGvX
åskådliggörande/ACY
återuppbyggnadsarbete/ACEFY
ögonbad/ABD
övertimma/AEIRY
